tr_test.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX Ҝ Y 124
SFX Ҝ 0 'ü/ѧ [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'sü/ѧ [aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünün [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'üne [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünde [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünden/ѧ [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeydi [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeydim [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeydin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeydik [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeydiniz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeydiler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeymiş [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeymişim [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeymişsin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeymişiz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeymişsiniz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeymişler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyse [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeysem [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeysen [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeysek [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyseniz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyseler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyim [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündesin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyiz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündesiniz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündedir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündedirler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündelerdir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyken [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyimdir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündesindir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeyizdir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündesinizdir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündeki [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekiler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilere [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerde [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerden [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerle [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerce [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekileri [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerini [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerine [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerinde [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerinden [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekileriyle [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekilerinin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekini [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekine [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekinde [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekinden [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekinin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekiyle [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekiyse [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekidir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekiydi [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekiymiş [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ündekiyken [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündü [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündüm [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündün [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündük [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündünüz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündüler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününmüş [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününmüşüm [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününmüşsün [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününmüşüz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününmüşsünüz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününmüşler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününse [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününsem [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününsen [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününsek [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününseniz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününseler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününüm [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününsün [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününüz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününsünüz [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündür [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ünündürler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününlerdir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününken [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününümdür [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününsündür [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününüzdür [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününsünüzdür [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününki [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkiler [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilere [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerde [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerden [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerle [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerce [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkileri [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerini [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerine [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerinde [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerinden [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkileriyle [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkilerinin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkini [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkine [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkinde [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkinden [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkinin [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkiyle [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkiyse [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkidir [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkiydi [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkiymiş [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'ününkiyken [^aeıioöuüâîûAEIİOÖUÜÂÎÛ]
SFX Ҝ 0 'sü/ѧ [A-Z]
SFX Ҝ 0 'sü/ѧ km
SFX Ҝ 0 'sü/ѧ cm
SFX Ҝ 0 'sü/ѧ mm
SFX ҝ Y 115
SFX ҝ 0 'dü .
SFX ҝ 0 'düm .
SFX ҝ 0 'dün .
SFX ҝ 0 'dük .
SFX ҝ 0 'dünüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'düler .
SFX ҝ 0 'tü .
SFX ҝ 0 'tüm .
SFX ҝ 0 'tün .
SFX ҝ 0 'tük .
SFX ҝ 0 'tünüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'tüler .
SFX ҝ 0 'müş .
SFX ҝ 0 'müşüm .
SFX ҝ 0 'müşsün .
SFX ҝ 0 'müşüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'müşsünüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'müşler .
SFX ҝ 0 'se .
SFX ҝ 0 'sem .
SFX ҝ 0 'sen .
SFX ҝ 0 'sek .
SFX ҝ 0 'seniz .
SFX ҝ 0 'seler .
SFX ҝ 0 'üm .
SFX ҝ 0 'sün .
SFX ҝ 0 'üz .
SFX ҝ 0 'sünüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'ler .
SFX ҝ 0 'dür .
SFX ҝ 0 'tür .
SFX ҝ 0 'dürler .
SFX ҝ 0 'türler .
SFX ҝ 0 'lerdir .
SFX ҝ 0 'ken .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümdür .
SFX ҝ 0 'sündür .
SFX ҝ 0 'üzdür .
SFX ҝ 0 'sünüzdür .
SFX ҝ 0 'lü .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüyle .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüler .
SFX ҝ 0 'lülere .
SFX ҝ 0 'lülerdi .
SFX ҝ 0 'lülerden .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüyü .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüye .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüde .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüden .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüydü .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüymüş .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüse .
SFX ҝ 0 'lüdür .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümün .
SFX ҝ 0 'üme .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümü .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümde .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümden .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümle .
SFX ҝ 0 'ün .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünün .
SFX ҝ 0 'üne .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünü .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünde .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünden .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünle .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümüzün .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümüze .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümüzü .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümüzde .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümüzden .
SFX ҝ 0 'ümüzle .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünüzün .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünüze .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünüzü .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünüzde .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünüzden .
SFX ҝ 0 'ünüzle .
SFX ҝ 0 'leri .
SFX ҝ 0 'lerini .
SFX ҝ 0 'lerine .
SFX ҝ 0 'lerinde .
SFX ҝ 0 'lerinden .
SFX ҝ 0 'lerinin .
SFX ҝ 0 'leriyle .
SFX ҝ 0 'm .
SFX ҝ 0 'mün .
SFX ҝ 0 'me .
SFX ҝ 0 'mü .
SFX ҝ 0 'mde .
SFX ҝ 0 'mden .
SFX ҝ 0 'mle .
SFX ҝ 0 'n .
SFX ҝ 0 'nün .
SFX ҝ 0 'ne .
SFX ҝ 0 'nü .
SFX ҝ 0 'nde .
SFX ҝ 0 'nden .
SFX ҝ 0 'nle .
SFX ҝ 0 'müz .
SFX ҝ 0 'müzün .
SFX ҝ 0 'müze .
SFX ҝ 0 'müzü .
SFX ҝ 0 'müzde .
SFX ҝ 0 'müzden .
SFX ҝ 0 'müzle .
SFX ҝ 0 'nüz .
SFX ҝ 0 'nüzün .
SFX ҝ 0 'nüze .
SFX ҝ 0 'nüzü .
SFX ҝ 0 'nüzde .
SFX ҝ 0 'nüzden .
SFX ҝ 0 'nüzle .

# VOICING COPULA FLAGS
SFX ѓ Y 4
SFX ѓ 0 ım .
SFX ѓ 0 ız .
SFX ѓ 0 ımdır .
SFX ѓ 0 ızdır .
SFX ѻ Y 4
SFX ѻ 0 im .
SFX ѻ 0 iz .
SFX ѻ 0 imdir .
SFX ѻ 0 izdir .
