tr_test.dic
Tenasüh/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Düz/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
rahmetliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
bastıbacağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Prosedür/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Çörkü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
cikciğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
ulac/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Kâkül/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
müşfiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Müdür/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
perikard/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
alamed/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Lök/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
dızdığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
küçücüğ/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
Tefahür/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
istiab/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
sahleb/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Desinatörlüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
yedeğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
kulağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Altkültür/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
magnezid/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
bangkoğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Bürgü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
tülbend/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
palamud/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Döş/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
leyleğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
kabağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
kerpic/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Kümültü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
kazığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Müftü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
elektromekaniğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
sonuc/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Tedavül/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
onomastiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
irab/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Düzköy/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
çevriğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
ardıc/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Dillidüdüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
kozmiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
asalaklığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Tahammürü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
karagevreğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
akkuyruğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Menüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
çelişiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Sekizyüzlü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
kaltağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
sismiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
bıçaklığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Römorkör/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
penciğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Ayıüzümü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
selaniğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
inad/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Cüz/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
antialerjiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
melekûd/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Beşikdüzü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
üzlüğ/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
erkânıharb/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
mutemed/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Püstül/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
uruğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
paraboliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Eminönü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
göstergec/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
pabuc/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Uzunköprüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
güdeğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Güvercingöğsüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
tutuğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
endirekd/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Rükün/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
meşkûğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Öngörü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
apokaliptiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
tarağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Teferrüt/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
üşütüğ/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
sulağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
beşyüzlüğ/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
Büzük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
pisliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Çürüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
ikibuçukluğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
haric/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
kavud/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Düğmüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
zümrüd/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
fıkırdağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Vezirköprüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
içreğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
şipşağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Atasözü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
tınned/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
kataleptiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
sağlağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Kısırdöngü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Raportör/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
ittırad/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
tabib/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Albüm/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
mütezayid/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
kalıc/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Gündönümü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
ard/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Garantör/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
zivirciğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
torlağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Artıkgün/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
ağnağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
defihaced/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Devedöşlü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
dolangac/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Fondü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
genelgelemeğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Güğül/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
ikiyıllığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
kapsüllemeğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Kaşkollü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
kılıçbacağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Leğenölçüm/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
otağ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
otodidaktiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Püsürüklük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Tilmenhöyük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
toplukonud/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
türkolojiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
yıkamac/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Önyüz/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
abacılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
akademisyenliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
aksaraylılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
antrepoculuğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Asansörcülük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
aynasızlığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
bahçeliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
balkanlığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
başuzmanlığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
betimselliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
böğürtlenliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Bürgüsüz/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
bıçakçılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
deneyciliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
dessaslığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
diskjokeyliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Dövüşçülük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
dızdızcılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
efsaneviliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
esirgeyiciliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Eşgüdümcü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
fevkaladeliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
fırıldaklığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
girginliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Göllük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Görüşü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
güldürücülüğ/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
Gülütçülük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
hatalılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
haşinliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Hödüklük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
ihracatçılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
ilintililiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
işkenceciliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
jandarmalığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
karalığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
kaçmaklığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
kemalistliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Kontrolörlük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
koşullanmışlığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
kronikçiliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Körükçülük/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Küşümlü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
kıratlığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
lüferciliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
mahmuzcuğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
meşakkatsizliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
meşruluğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Mühürlüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
mümessilliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
nifakçılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
nispetçiliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
oyalayıcılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
prodüktörlüğ/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
pulculuğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Pürüzlülüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
sapıklığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
sarihliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Senatörlüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
sistemciliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
solukluğ/ЁѡЪсбемпѓX
Süprüntülüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
taklacılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
talebeliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Terörcüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
tokmakçılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
toplumbilimciliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Tütüncülüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
uygarlıkçılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
yalınkatlığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
yaveliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
yaşlığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Zülüflüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
zürriyetsizliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
çamaşırcılığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
ölçeksizliğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Ölümlüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Öykücüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
Ürünlüsü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
üzgünlüğ/ЃѢЬугзоцѻX
ıraksaklığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Dünkü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
homeostatiğ/ЂѢЫтвжнфѻX
Dönüklüğü/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
kurbanlarıydığ/ЀѡЩрадклѓX
Gön/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
ÖSYM/УҖҗҘҙҚқҜҝ
